Connecticut, session 2026, SB00409.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) (a) The chairpersons of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to public safety and security shall convene a working
group to study the statutory roles of the various law enforcement and
public safety positions in the state, as set forth in the general statutes.
Such study shall include, but need not be limited to, an identification of
the various positions performing law enforcement and public safety
functions throughout the state, an identification of the specific
jurisdiction and responsibilities of such positions, an assessment of
which such positions are required to be trained or certified by the Police
Officer Standards and Training Council and an assessment of any
statutory changes that may be necessary for the purpose of
appropriately defining such positions or for any other purpose related
to the objectives of the working group.
SB409 / File No. 307 1

SB409 File No. 307
(b) The working group shall include, but need not be limited to, the
following members:
(1) The chairpersons and ranking members of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public safety and security, or their designees;
(2) The Commissioner of Emergency Services and Public Protection,
or the commissioner's designee;
(3) The Commissioner of Correction, or the commissioner's designee;
(4) One representative of the Court Support Services Division of the
Judicial Branch, who shall be appointed by the chairpersons of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to public safety and security;
(5) One representative of the Police Officer Standards and Training
Council, who shall be appointed by the chairpersons of the joint
standing committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of
matters relating to public safety and security;
(6) One representative of the Connecticut Police Chiefs Association,
who shall be appointed by the chairpersons of the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to public safety and security; and
(7) Any additional members, as deemed necessary by the
chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the General Assembly
having cognizance of matters relating to public safety and security.
(c) The chairpersons of the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public safety and
security shall schedule the first meeting of the working group, which
shall be held not later than sixty days after the effective date of this
section.
(d) The members of the working group shall select two
SB409 / File No. 307 2

SB409 File No. 307
cochairpersons from among the members of the working group.
(e) The administrative staff of the joint standing committee of the
General Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public safety
and security shall serve as administrative staff of the working group.
(f) Not later than January 1, 2027, the working group shall submit a
report on its findings and recommendations, including any proposed
legislative proposals, to the joint standing committee of the General
Assembly having cognizance of matters relating to public safety and
security, in accordance with the provisions of section 11-4a of the
general statutes. The working group shall terminate on the date that it
submits such report or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage New section
PS Joint Favorable
SB409 / File No. 307 3

SB409 File No. 307
The following Fiscal Impact Statement and Bill Analysis are prepared for the benefit of the members of
the General Assembly, solely for purposes of information, summarization and explanation and do not
represent the intent of the General Assembly or either chamber thereof for any purpose. In general,
fiscal impacts are based upon a variety of informational sources, including the analyst’s professional
knowledge. Whenever applicable, agency data is consulted as part of the analysis, however final
products do not necessarily reflect an assessment from any specific department.
OFA Fiscal Note
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
Explanation
The bill, which has no fiscal impact, creates a working group to study
the statutory roles of the various law enforcement and public safety
positions in the state. It is anticipated that the members of the working
group have the expertise necessary to meet the requirements of the bill.
The Out Years
State Impact: None
Municipal Impact: None
SB409 / File No. 307 4

SB409 File No. 307
OLR Bill Analysis
SB 409
AN ACT ESTABLISHING A WORKING GROUP TO STUDY THE
STATUTORY ROLES OF THE VARIOUS LAW ENFORCEMENT AND
PUBLIC SAFETY POSITIONS IN THE STATE.